Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-404
Director; duties.

It shall be the duty of the director of the commission (1) to administer the work and activities of the commission, (2) to purchase books, periodicals, other library materials, and all necessary equipment and supplies for the commission, (3) to keep a catalog of all books, periodicals and other library materials belonging to the commission, (4) to keep a record of all books and property added to the library of the commission, and the cost thereof, (5) to keep a record of all books, periodicals and other library materials loaned by the commission and notify the borrowers of the expiration period of the loan, and (6) to keep fiscal and other operational records in accordance with state regulations.

Laws 1935, c. 115, § 4, p. 371;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-504;

R.S.1943, § 51-404;

Laws 1972, LB 1033, § 8.